Utah statutes.
58-81-103.   Eligibility for volunteer health care practitioner license -- Delegation of service agreement.

(1)  A health care practitioner is eligible to apply to the division and board for a volunteer health care practitioner license if the health care practitioner:

(a)  certifies to the division and board that the applicant will be engaged exclusively in volunteer health care services; and

(b)  completes an application for a volunteer health care practitioner license, which includes documentation:

(i)  of professional education, exams passed, and graduation;

(ii)  of practice history;

(iii)  of a qualified location for which the health care practitioner will be practicing;

(iv)  identifying the supervising health care practitioner and the supervising health care practitioner's delegation of service agreement with the volunteer practitioner; and

(v)  that the applicant has:

(A)  previously been issued an unrestricted license to practice in Utah or another state of the United States;

(B)  never been the subject of any significant disciplinary action in any jurisdiction; and

(C)  is in good health and does not have a condition which would impair the health care practitioner's ability to practice with reasonable skill and safety to patients.

(2)  A health care provider who has agreed to be a supervising professional for a volunteer at a qualified location shall:

(a)  enter into a delegation of service agreement with the volunteer health care practitioner;

(b)  agree to provide the level of supervision required in Subsection 58-81-102(5);

(c)  determine with the volunteer whether the volunteer's scope of practice or ability to prescribe controlled substances will be limited by the delegation of service agreement;

(d)  include in the delegation of service agreement that the volunteer may not prescribe a controlled substance to himself, the volunteer's family, or a staff member of the qualified location; and

(e)  forward the delegation of service agreement to the division.



Enacted by Chapter 263, 2009 General Session

